Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-553
Class VI school district; board of education; members; election.

The governing body of each Class VI school district shall be a board consisting of a president, a vice president, a secretary, a treasurer, and two other voting members, to be elected as provided in section 32-546, and also may include one or more nonvoting student members selected pursuant to section 79-559.

Laws 1901, c. 64, § 5, p. 442;

R.S.1913, § 6806;

Laws 1915, c. 118, § 1, p. 269;

Laws 1917, c. 122, § 1, p. 299;

C.S.1922, §§ 6377, 6378;

C.S.1929, §§ 79-805, 79-806;

R.S.1943, § 79-806;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 296, p. 790;

Laws 1972, LB 661, § 86;

Laws 1972, LB 1314, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 413, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 303, § 7;

Laws 1982, LB 440, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 499, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 56;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 61;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 605;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1103;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 306.

For qualifications of members of board of education, see section 79-543.

Vacancies, see section 79-545.